Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-209
Libel, slander, or invasion of privacy; one cause of action.

No person shall have more than one cause of action for damages for libel or slander or invasion of privacy or any other tort founded upon any single publication, exhibition, or utterance, such as any one issue of a newspaper or book or magazine or any one presentation to an audience or any one broadcast over radio or television or any one exhibition of a motion picture. Recovery in any action shall include all damages for any such tort suffered by the plaintiff in all jurisdictions.

Laws 1979, LB 394, § 9.

Defamatory statements, civil actions authorized, see sections 25-839 to 25-840.02.

This section prevents multiple recoveries from a single publication, but it does not force a plaintiff to elect among libel, slander, and invasion of privacy with respect to the claim a plaintiff advances resulting from a single publication by the defendant. Bojanski v. Foley, 18 Neb. App. 929, 798 N.W.2d 134 (2011).